package/opt/kingsoft/wps-office/office6/dicts/fr_FR/main.aff
FLAG long
SFX b5 Y 254
SFX b5 er er/89 er 64
SFX b5 er ant/18 [^c]er 48
SFX b5 cer çant/18 cer 48
SFX b5 ecer èce/27 ecer 34
SFX b5 emer ème/27 emer 34
SFX b5 ener ène/27 ener 34
SFX b5 eper èpe/27 eper 34
SFX b5 erer ère/27 erer 34
SFX b5 eser èse/27 eser 34
SFX b5 ever ève/27 ever 34
SFX b5 evrer èvre/27 evrer 34
SFX b5 eter ète/27 eter 34
SFX b5 eler èle/27 eler 34
SFX b5 ecer èces/25 ecer 35
SFX b5 emer èmes/25 emer 35
SFX b5 ener ènes/25 ener 35
SFX b5 eper èpes/25 eper 35
SFX b5 erer ères/25 erer 35
SFX b5 eser èses/25 eser 35
SFX b5 ever èves/25 ever 35
SFX b5 evrer èvres/25 evrer 35
SFX b5 eter ètes/25 eter 35
SFX b5 eler èles/25 eler 35
SFX b5 ecer èce/18 ecer 21
SFX b5 emer ème/18 emer 21
SFX b5 ener ène/18 ener 21
SFX b5 eper èpe/18 eper 21
SFX b5 erer ère/18 erer 21
SFX b5 eser èse/18 eser 21
SFX b5 ever ève/18 ever 21
SFX b5 evrer èvre/18 evrer 21
SFX b5 eter ète/18 eter 21
SFX b5 eler èle/18 eler 21
SFX b5 er ons/35 [^c]er 56
SFX b5 cer çons/35 cer 56
SFX b5 er ez/32 er 72
SFX b5 ecer ècent/18 ecer 26
SFX b5 emer èment/18 emer 26
SFX b5 ener ènent/18 ener 26
SFX b5 eper èpent/18 eper 26
SFX b5 erer èrent/18 erer 26
SFX b5 eser èsent/18 eser 26
SFX b5 ever èvent/18 ever 26
SFX b5 evrer èvrent/18 evrer 26
SFX b5 eter ètent/18 eter 26
SFX b5 eler èlent/18 eler 26
SFX b5 er ais/27 [^c]er 66
SFX b5 cer çais/27 cer 66
SFX b5 er ais/25 [^c]er 65
SFX b5 cer çais/25 cer 65
SFX b5 er ait/18 [^c]er 50
SFX b5 cer çait/18 cer 50
SFX b5 er ions/35 er 77
SFX b5 er iez/32 er 76
SFX b5 er aient/18 [^c]er 51
SFX b5 cer çaient/18 cer 51
SFX b5 er ai/27 [^c]er 69
SFX b5 cer çai/27 cer 69
SFX b5 er as/25 [^c]er 68
SFX b5 cer ças/25 cer 68
SFX b5 er a/18 [^c]er 53
SFX b5 cer ça/18 cer 53
SFX b5 er âmes/35 [^c]er 63
SFX b5 cer çâmes/35 cer 63
SFX b5 er âtes/32 [^c]er 62
SFX b5 cer çâtes/32 cer 62
SFX b5 er èrent/18 er 71
SFX b5 ecer ècerai/27 ecer 38
SFX b5 emer èmerai/27 emer 38
SFX b5 ener ènerai/27 ener 38
SFX b5 eper èperai/27 eper 38
SFX b5 erer èrerai/27 erer 38
SFX b5 eser èserai/27 eser 38
SFX b5 ever èverai/27 ever 38
SFX b5 evrer èvrerai/27 evrer 38
SFX b5 eter èterai/27 eter 38
SFX b5 eler èlerai/27 eler 38
SFX b5 ecer èceras/25 ecer 37
SFX b5 emer èmeras/25 emer 37
SFX b5 ener èneras/25 ener 37
SFX b5 eper èperas/25 eper 37
SFX b5 erer èreras/25 erer 37
SFX b5 eser èseras/25 eser 37
SFX b5 ever èveras/25 ever 37
SFX b5 evrer èvreras/25 evrer 37
SFX b5 eter èteras/25 eter 37
SFX b5 eler èleras/25 eler 37
SFX b5 ecer ècera/18 ecer 22
SFX b5 emer èmera/18 emer 22
SFX b5 ener ènera/18 ener 22
SFX b5 eper èpera/18 eper 22
SFX b5 erer èrera/18 erer 22
SFX b5 eser èsera/18 eser 22
SFX b5 ever èvera/18 ever 22
SFX b5 evrer èvrera/18 evrer 22
SFX b5 eter ètera/18 eter 22
SFX b5 eler èlera/18 eler 22
SFX b5 ecer ècerons/35 ecer 31
SFX b5 emer èmerons/35 emer 31
SFX b5 ener ènerons/35 ener 31
SFX b5 eper èperons/35 eper 31
SFX b5 erer èrerons/35 erer 31
SFX b5 eser èserons/35 eser 31
SFX b5 ever èverons/35 ever 31
SFX b5 evrer èvrerons/35 evrer 31
SFX b5 eter èterons/35 eter 31
SFX b5 eler èlerons/35 eler 31
SFX b5 ecer ècerez/32 ecer 30
SFX b5 emer èmerez/32 emer 30
SFX b5 ener ènerez/32 ener 30
SFX b5 eper èperez/32 eper 30
SFX b5 erer èrerez/32 erer 30
SFX b5 eser èserez/32 eser 30
SFX b5 ever èverez/32 ever 30
SFX b5 evrer èvrerez/32 evrer 30
SFX b5 eter èterez/32 eter 30
SFX b5 eler èlerez/32 eler 30
SFX b5 ecer èceront/18 ecer 24
SFX b5 emer èmeront/18 emer 24
SFX b5 ener èneront/18 ener 24
SFX b5 eper èperont/18 eper 24
SFX b5 erer èreront/18 erer 24
SFX b5 eser èseront/18 eser 24
SFX b5 ever èveront/18 ever 24
SFX b5 evrer èvreront/18 evrer 24
SFX b5 eter èteront/18 eter 24
SFX b5 eler èleront/18 eler 24
SFX b5 ecer ècerais/27 ecer 40
SFX b5 emer èmerais/27 emer 40
SFX b5 ener ènerais/27 ener 40
SFX b5 eper èperais/27 eper 40
SFX b5 erer èrerais/27 erer 40
SFX b5 eser èserais/27 eser 40
SFX b5 ever èverais/27 ever 40
SFX b5 evrer èvrerais/27 evrer 40
SFX b5 eter èterais/27 eter 40
SFX b5 eler èlerais/27 eler 40
SFX b5 ecer ècerais/25 ecer 39
SFX b5 emer èmerais/25 emer 39
SFX b5 ener ènerais/25 ener 39
SFX b5 eper èperais/25 eper 39
SFX b5 erer èrerais/25 erer 39
SFX b5 eser èserais/25 eser 39
SFX b5 ever èverais/25 ever 39
SFX b5 evrer èvrerais/25 evrer 39
SFX b5 eter èterais/25 eter 39
SFX b5 eler èlerais/25 eler 39
SFX b5 ecer ècerait/18 ecer 23
SFX b5 emer èmerait/18 emer 23
SFX b5 ener ènerait/18 ener 23
SFX b5 eper èperait/18 eper 23
SFX b5 erer èrerait/18 erer 23
SFX b5 eser èserait/18 eser 23
SFX b5 ever èverait/18 ever 23
SFX b5 evrer èvrerait/18 evrer 23
SFX b5 eter èterait/18 eter 23
SFX b5 eler èlerait/18 eler 23
SFX b5 ecer ècerions/35 ecer 33
SFX b5 emer èmerions/35 emer 33
SFX b5 ener ènerions/35 ener 33
SFX b5 eper èperions/35 eper 33
SFX b5 erer èrerions/35 erer 33
SFX b5 eser èserions/35 eser 33
SFX b5 ever èverions/35 ever 33
SFX b5 evrer èvrerions/35 evrer 33
SFX b5 eter èterions/35 eter 33
SFX b5 eler èlerions/35 eler 33
SFX b5 ecer èceriez/32 ecer 32
SFX b5 emer èmeriez/32 emer 32
SFX b5 ener èneriez/32 ener 32
SFX b5 eper èperiez/32 eper 32
SFX b5 erer èreriez/32 erer 32
SFX b5 eser èseriez/32 eser 32
SFX b5 ever èveriez/32 ever 32
SFX b5 evrer èvreriez/32 evrer 32
SFX b5 eter èteriez/32 eter 32
SFX b5 eler èleriez/32 eler 32
SFX b5 ecer èceraient/18 ecer 25
SFX b5 emer èmeraient/18 emer 25
SFX b5 ener èneraient/18 ener 25
SFX b5 eper èperaient/18 eper 25
SFX b5 erer èreraient/18 erer 25
SFX b5 eser èseraient/18 eser 25
SFX b5 ever èveraient/18 ever 25
SFX b5 evrer èvreraient/18 evrer 25
SFX b5 eter èteraient/18 eter 25
SFX b5 eler èleraient/18 eler 25
SFX b5 ecer èce/27 ecer 41
SFX b5 emer ème/27 emer 41
SFX b5 ener ène/27 ener 41
SFX b5 eper èpe/27 eper 41
SFX b5 erer ère/27 erer 41
SFX b5 eser èse/27 eser 41
SFX b5 ever ève/27 ever 41
SFX b5 evrer èvre/27 evrer 41
SFX b5 eter ète/27 eter 41
SFX b5 eler èle/27 eler 41
SFX b5 ecer èces/25 ecer 44
SFX b5 emer èmes/25 emer 44
SFX b5 ener ènes/25 ener 44
SFX b5 eper èpes/25 eper 44
SFX b5 erer ères/25 erer 44
SFX b5 eser èses/25 eser 44
SFX b5 ever èves/25 ever 44
SFX b5 evrer èvres/25 evrer 44
SFX b5 eter ètes/25 eter 44
SFX b5 eler èles/25 eler 44
SFX b5 ecer èce/18 ecer 27
SFX b5 emer ème/18 emer 27
SFX b5 ener ène/18 ener 27
SFX b5 eper èpe/18 eper 27
SFX b5 erer ère/18 erer 27
SFX b5 eser èse/18 eser 27
SFX b5 ever ève/18 ever 27
SFX b5 evrer èvre/18 evrer 27
SFX b5 eter ète/18 eter 27
SFX b5 eler èle/18 eler 27
SFX b5 er ions/35 er 74
SFX b5 er iez/32 er 73
SFX b5 ecer ècent/18 ecer 28
SFX b5 emer èment/18 emer 28
SFX b5 ener ènent/18 ener 28
SFX b5 eper èpent/18 eper 28
SFX b5 erer èrent/18 erer 28
SFX b5 eser èsent/18 eser 28
SFX b5 ever èvent/18 ever 28
SFX b5 evrer èvrent/18 evrer 28
SFX b5 eter ètent/18 eter 28
SFX b5 eler èlent/18 eler 28
SFX b5 er asse/27 [^c]er 61
SFX b5 cer çasse/27 cer 61
SFX b5 er asses/25 [^c]er 67
SFX b5 cer çasses/25 cer 67
SFX b5 er ât/18 [^c]er 52
SFX b5 cer çât/18 cer 52
SFX b5 er assions/35 [^c]er 60
SFX b5 cer çassions/35 cer 60
SFX b5 er assiez/32 [^c]er 59
SFX b5 cer çassiez/32 cer 59
SFX b5 er assent/18 [^c]er 54
SFX b5 cer çassent/18 cer 54
SFX b5 ecer èce/32 ecer 36
SFX b5 emer ème/32 emer 36
SFX b5 ener ène/32 ener 36
SFX b5 eper èpe/32 eper 36
SFX b5 erer ère/32 erer 36
SFX b5 eser èse/32 eser 36
SFX b5 ever ève/32 ever 36
SFX b5 evrer èvre/32 evrer 36
SFX b5 eter ète/32 eter 36
SFX b5 eler èle/32 eler 36
SFX b5 er ons/13 [^c]er 58
SFX b5 cer çons/13 cer 58
SFX b5 er ez/13 er 75
